Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4014 of Title 69, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
In addition to all other sources of information used when
updating the Oklahoma Department of Transportation's Eight-Year
Construction Work Plan, the Department shall consult with the
members of the State Legislature regarding construction priorities
for the Plan. The consultation process shall include, but may not
be limited to, a presentation of the Plan to relevant legislative
committees allowing an opportunity for legislators to provide
feedback, recommendations, and priorities from their districts for
consideration in the plan.
Req. No. 11108 Page 1

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11108 JBH 12/09/24





















Req. No. 11108 Page 2